Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1262YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 101 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 75.1A Bond issuance ââ limitation. 1 For projects for which a proposition to issue bonds was 2 approved at an election held after July 1, 2025, the total 3 amount of bonds issued for the project under any provision of 4 law shall not exceed an amount equal to eighty percent of the 5 total cost of the project. The remaining costs of the project 6 shall be funded from sources other than from the sale of bonds. 7